Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB697.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.43-350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to its other powers, the cabinet may suspend the authority of a municipal
solid waste management facility to accept waste streams upon any of the following
grounds:
(a) The cabinet finds that any shipment of waste contains waste excluded by law
from municipal solid waste disposal facilities in the Commonwealth;
(b) Any part of the waste streams in question are being transported by
transporters whose vehicles and drivers do not comply with the provisions of
KRS Chapter 281 or 281A.
(2) The suspension described in subsection (1) of this section shall terminate upon the
cabinet's determination that the basis for the suspension has been corrected.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary:
(a) Metallurgic industrial wastes generated outside of the Commonwealth shall
not be deemed a residual solid waste, regardless of whether the waste is
reprocessed, and the waste shall not be disposed of in the residual waste site
or facility by its owner or operator or by the solid waste generator's wholly
owned subsidiary regardless of whether the metallurgic, industrial solid
waste was used in the manufacturing or industrial processes of the plant,
business, or operation; and
(b) The cabinet shall suspend a residual waste facility from accepting any
metallurgic, industrial solid waste generated outside of the state and then
transported into the county where the industrial or manufacturing plant,
business, or operation of a residual waste site owner or operator is located
for the purpose of reprocessing the metallurgic industrial waste and
disposing of the metallurgic, industrial waste in the residual waste site or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1945
facility.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:04 PM Jacketed